Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 4. Marine Antifoulant Paints.

§ 3.2-3935.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Acceptable release rate”
means a measured release rate not to exceed 4.0 micrograms per square centimeter per day at steady state conditions as determined in accordance with a U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) testing procedure as outlined in the EPA data call-in notice of July 29, 1986, on tributyltin in antifoulant paints under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act, (7 U.S.C. § 136 et seq.); or a lower release rate if adopted by the Board as necessary to protect health or the environment.

“Commercial boat yard”
means any facility that engages for hire in the construction, storage, maintenance, repair or refurbishing of vessels (other than seaplanes) or any licensed independent marine maintenance contractor who engages in such activities.

“Marine antifoulant paint”
means any compound, coating, paint or treatment applied or used for the purpose of controlling freshwater or marine fouling organisms on vessels.

“Tributyltin compounds”
means any compound having three normal butyl groups attached to a tin atom and with or without an anion such as chloride, fluoride or oxide.

“Vessel”
means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on the water, whether self-propelled or otherwise, and includes barges and tugs.

History.

1987, c. 15, § 3.1-249.22; 1989, c. 575, § 3.1-249.59; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3936.
Sale and application of tributyltin compounds.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is unlawful to distribute, possess, sell or offer for sale, apply or offer for use or application any marine antifoulant paint containing tributyltin compounds. Authorized personnel of the Department of Wildlife Resources, Virginia Marine Resources Commission, or the Department may seize any antifoulant paint held in violation of this article and any seized substances shall be considered forfeited.

A person may distribute or sell a marine antifoulant paint containing tributyltin with an acceptable release rate to the owner or agent of a commercial boat yard. The owner or agent of a commercial boat yard may possess, apply, or purchase an antifoulant paint containing tributyltin with an acceptable release rate. Such paint may be applied only within a commercial boat yard and only to vessels that exceed 25 meters (82.02 feet) in length or that have aluminum hulls.

A person may distribute, sell or apply a marine antifoulant paint containing tributyltin with an acceptable release rate if: (i) the paint is distributed or sold in a spray can in a quantity of 16 ounces avoirdupois weight or less; and (ii) is commonly referred to as outboard or lower unit paint.

History.

1987, c. 15, § 3.1-249.23; 1989, c. 575, § 3.1-249.60; 2008, c. 860; 2020, c. 958.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection A, last sentence.

§ 3.2-3937.
Educational programs.

The State Water Control Board, the Board of Wildlife Resources, the Virginia Marine Resources Commission, the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, and the Department shall through cooperative programs develop and implement a program to inform interstate and intrastate paint manufacturers and distributors, vessel owners, and commercial boat yards of the properties of tributyltin in marine antifoulant paints and the law to restrict its use.

History.

1987, c. 15, § 3.1-249.24; 1989, c. 575, § 3.1-249.61; 2008, c. 860; 2020, c. 958.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Board of Wildlife Resources” for “Board of Game and Inland Fisheries.”